North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-08 Regulations Governing Operators
39-08-11.
When driver unable to report.

A crash notice is not required from any person who is physically incapable of making the report during the period of such incapacity.

Whenever the driver of a vehicle is physically incapable of giving an immediate notice of a crash and there was another occupant in the vehicle at the time of the crash capable of doing so, the occupant shall make or cause to be given the notice not given by the driver.

Whenever the driver is physically incapable of giving notice of a crash and the driver is not the owner of the vehicle, then the owner of the vehicle involved shall within five days after learning of the crash give the notice and insurance information not given by the driver.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 8; 1957, ch. 362, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0811; S.L. 1983, ch. 434, § 2; 2021, ch. 295, § 4, effective July 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of “amnesty” provision whereby automobile driver leaving scene of accident may report to police within stated time without risk of use of his report against him, 36 A.L.R.4th 907.

39-08-12.
False reports. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

39-08-13.
Crash report forms.

The director shall prepare and supply to law enforcement agencies, garages, and other suitable agencies or individuals forms for crash reports required by law, appropriate with respect to the purposes to be served. The reports to be made by investigating officers shall call for sufficiently detailed information to disclose the cause of a traffic crash, conditions then existing, persons and vehicles involved, and whether the requirements for the deposit of security under section 39-16-05 are applicable.

Every crash report required to be made to the director must be made in the format prescribed by the director and must contain all the information required therein unless not available.

Every law enforcement officer who investigates a vehicle crash for which a report must be made as required in this chapter shall forward a report of such crash to the department within ten days after the crash.

Except as provided in subsection 5, reports required to be forwarded by law enforcement officers and the information contained in the reports is not privileged or confidential. Crash reports held by a public entity other than the department of transportation and a law enforcement agency that contracts with service providers are exempt records. In addition, the following information contained in the report is an exempt record as defined in section 44-04-17.1 unless the requester is a party to the crash, a party’s legal representative, the insurer of any party to the crash, the agent of that insurer, or the legal representative or insurer of an individual involved in defending or investigating a prior or subsequent claim or crash involving a party to the crash:

Driver identification number of a party in the report;

Telephone number of a party in the report;

Insurance company name and policy number of a party in the report; and

Day and month of birth of a party in the report.

Unless the requester is a party to the accident, a party’s legal representative, the insurer of any party to the accident, the agent of that insurer, or the legal representative or insurer of an individual involved in defending or investigating a prior or subsequent claim or accident involving a party to the accident, the following information contained in the report is exempt:

The name of a minor party in the report;

Driver identification number of a minor party in the report; and

Telephone number uniquely owned by a minor party in the report.

Upon request from a party to the crash, a party’s legal representative, the insurer of any party to the crash, the agent of the insurer, or the legal representative or insurer of an individual involved in defending or investigating a prior or subsequent claim or crash involving a party to the crash, and upon payment of a fee of up to seven dollars, the director shall release a completed copy of the crash report to the entity requesting the information. The request must be made on the form prescribed by the director.

Upon request of any person and upon payment of a fee of up to seven dollars, the director may furnish to a requester a copy of an investigating officer’s crash report which does not contain any exempt information that may not be disclosed, if the report shows that the crash is one for which a driver is required to file a report under section 39-08-09.

Copies of crash reports are not admissible as evidence in any action for damages or criminal proceedings arising out of a motor vehicle crash.

The director, without a request under subsection 4, 5, or 6, may send a copy of a crash report to the registered owner of each vehicle involved as indicated by the report.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 10; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0813; S.L. 1967, ch. 308, § 1; 1979, ch. 187, § 80; 1983, ch. 435, § 1; 1985, ch. 435, § 2; 1993, ch. 389, § 2; 2003, ch. 312, § 7; 2005, ch. 334, § 1; 2005, ch. 377, § 2; 2009, ch. 336, § 1; 2013, ch. 303, §§ 1, 2; 2021, ch. 286, § 2, effective April 13, 2021; 2021, ch. 295, § 5, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 39, § 10, effective May 3, 2021.

Note.

Section 39-08-13 was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 295, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1098: and Section 2 of Chapter 286, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1185; and Section 10 of Chapter 39, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2011.

Section 10 of chapter 39, S.L. 2021, provides, “

REPEAL.

Subdivision b of subsection 5 of
section 39-08-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.”

39-08-14.
Public inspection of reports relating to crashes.

All crash reports made by persons involved in crashes or by garages shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting and shall be for the confidential use of the department or other state agencies having use for the records for crash prevention purposes, or for the administration of the laws of this state relating to the deposit of security and proof of financial responsibility by persons driving or the owners of motor vehicles, except that the department may disclose the identity of a person involved in a crash when such identity is not otherwise known or when such person denies the person’s presence at such crash.

All crash reports and supplemental information filed in connection with the administration of the laws of this state relating to the deposit of security or proof of financial responsibility are confidential and not open to general public inspection, nor may copying of lists of such reports be permitted.

No written reports or written information mentioned in this section may be used as evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of a crash, except that the director shall furnish upon demand of any party to such trial, or upon demand of any court, a certificate showing that a specified crash report has or has not been made to the director in compliance with law.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any information compiled or otherwise made available to the department pursuant to this chapter must be transmitted to each and every duly authorized official or agency of the United States requesting such.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 12; 1957, ch. 262, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0814; S.L. 1963, ch. 277, § 9; 1965, ch. 274, § 1; 1967, ch. 308, § 2; 2021, ch. 295, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Admissibility of report of police or other public officer or employee, or portions of report, as to cause of or responsibility for accident, injury to person, or damage to property, 69 A.L.R.2d 1148.

39-08-15.
Director of the department of transportation to tabulate and analyze crash reports.

The director shall tabulate and may analyze all crash reports and shall publish annually, or at more frequent intervals, statistical information based thereon as to the number and circumstances of traffic crashes.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 13; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0815; 2021, ch. 295, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

39-08-16.
Any incorporated city may require crash reports.

Any incorporated city or other municipality may by ordinance require that the driver of a vehicle involved in a crash shall file with a designated city department a report of such crash or a copy of any report herein required to be filed with the director. All such reports must be for the confidential use of the city department and subject to the provisions of section 39-08-14.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 14; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0816; S.L. 1963, ch. 277, § 10; 2021, ch. 295, § 8, effective July 1, 2021.

39-08-17.
Magistrates to report convictions to highway commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 386, § 3.

39-08-18.
Open container law — Penalty.

A person may not drink or consume alcoholic beverages, as defined in section 5-01-01, in or on any motor vehicle when the vehicle is upon a public highway or in an area used principally for public parking. A person may not have in that person’s possession on that person’s person while in or on a private motor vehicle upon a public highway or in an area used principally for public parking, any bottle or receptacle containing alcoholic beverages which has been opened, or the seal broken, or the contents of which have been partially removed. It is unlawful for the owner of any private motor vehicle or the driver, if the owner be not then present in or on the motor vehicle, to keep or allow to be kept in a motor vehicle when such vehicle is upon the public highway or in an area used principally for public parking any bottle or receptacle containing such alcoholic beverages which has been opened, or the seal broken, or the contents of which have been partially removed except when such bottle or receptacle is kept in the trunk of the motor vehicle when such vehicle is equipped with a trunk, or kept in some other area of the vehicle not normally occupied by the driver or passengers, if the motor vehicle is not equipped with a trunk. A utility compartment or glove compartment must be deemed to be within the area occupied by the driver and passengers. This subsection does not prohibit the consumption or possession of alcoholic beverages in a house car if the consumption or possession occurs in the area of the house car used as sleeping or living quarters and that area is separated from the driving compartment by a solid partition, door, curtain, or some similar means of separation; however, consumption is not authorized while the house car is in motion. Any person violating this subsection must be assessed a fee of fifty dollars; however, the licensing authority may not record the violation against the person’s driving record unless the person was the driver of the motor vehicle at the time that the violation occurred.

Subsection 1 does not apply to a public conveyance that has been commercially chartered for group use, any passenger for compensation in a for-hire motor vehicle, or a privately owned motor vehicle operated by a person in the course of that person’s usual employment transporting passengers at the employer’s direction. This subsection does not authorize possession or consumption of an alcoholic beverage by the operator of any motor vehicle described in this subsection while upon a public highway or in an area used principally for public parking.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 10, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 5-0124; S.L. 1965, ch. 275, § 1; 1967, ch. 309, § 1; 1973, ch. 301, § 24; 1979, ch. 423, § 1; 1985, ch. 110, § 2; 1989, ch. 467, § 1; 2005, ch. 340, § 4.

39-08-19.
Penalty for harassment of domestic animals.

Any person operating a motorcycle, snowmobile, or other motor vehicle who willfully harasses or frightens any domestic animal, is, upon conviction, guilty of a class B misdemeanor. If injury or death results to the animal due to such action, such person is liable for the value of the animal and exemplary damages as provided in section 36-21-13.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 303, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 438; 2005, ch. 340, § 5.

Collateral References.

Liability for killing or injuring, by motor vehicle, livestock or fowl upon highway, 55 A.L.R.4th 822.

39-08-20.
Driving without liability insurance prohibited — Penalty.

A person may not drive, or the owner may not cause or knowingly permit to be driven, a motor vehicle in this state without a valid policy of liability insurance in effect in order to respond in damages for liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of that motor vehicle in the amount required by chapter 39-16.1.

Upon being stopped by a law enforcement officer for the purpose of enforcing or investigating the possible violation of an ordinance or state law, the person driving the motor vehicle shall provide to the officer upon request satisfactory evidence, including written or electronic proof of insurance, of the policy required under this section. If unable to comply with the request, that person may be charged with a violation of this section. If that person produces satisfactory evidence, including written or electronic proof of insurance, of a valid policy of liability insurance in effect at the time of the alleged violation of this section to the office of the prosecutor where the matter is pending, that person may not be found in violation of subsection 1.

Notwithstanding section 26.1-30-18, a person may be in violation of subsection 1 for failure to have a valid policy of liability insurance in effect under this section if the time of acquisition of the policy was after the time of the alleged incidence of driving without liability insurance. If the time of acquisition of the policy comes into question, the driver or owner has the burden of establishing the time of acquisition. If the driver is not an owner of the motor vehicle, the driver does not violate this section if the driver provides the court with evidence identifying the owner of the motor vehicle and describing circumstances under which the owner caused or permitted the driver to drive the motor vehicle.

For a second or subsequent violation of subsection 1 or equivalent ordinance, the court shall order the motor vehicle number plates of the motor vehicle owned and operated by the person at the time of the violation to be impounded until that person provides proof of insurance and a twenty dollar fee to the court. The person shall deliver the number plates to the court without delay at a time certain as ordered by the court. The court shall deliver the number plates to the office of the police officer that made the arrest and notify the department of the order. A person who does not provide the number plates to the court at the appropriate time is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

For a violation of subsection 1 or equivalent ordinance, the person shall provide proof of motor vehicle liability insurance to the department in the form of a written or electronically transmitted certificate from an insurance carrier authorized to do business in this state. This proof must be provided for a period of one year and kept on file with the department. If the person fails to provide this information, the department shall suspend that person’s driving privileges and may not issue or renew that person’s operator’s license unless that person provides proof of insurance.

A person who has violated subsection 1 or equivalent ordinance shall surrender that person’s operator’s license and purchase a duplicate operator’s license with a notation requiring that person to keep proof of liability insurance on file with the department. The fee for this license is fifty dollars and the fee to remove this notation is fifty dollars.

When an insurance carrier has certified a motor vehicle liability policy, the insurance carrier shall notify the director no later than ten days after cancellation or termination of the certified insurance policy by filing a notice of cancellation or termination of the certified insurance policy; except that a policy subsequently procured and certified shall, on the effective date of its certification, terminate the insurance previously certified with respect to any motor vehicle designated in both certificates.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 340, § 2; 1981, ch. 391, § 3; 1985, ch. 430, § 3; 1989, ch. 468, § 1; 1991, ch. 413, § 2; 1993, ch. 390, § 1; 1995, ch. 377, § 2; 1999, ch. 342, § 3; 2003, ch. 266, § 7; 2003, ch. 324, § 1; 2007, ch. 271, § 2; 2007, ch. 328, § 1; 2013, ch. 294, § 3; 2013, ch. 296, § 7; 2015, ch. 263, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 269, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 296, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 2 of chapter 263, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 1 of chapter 269, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 39-08-20 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 269, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1391 ; and Section 2 of Chapter 263, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2211.

Cross-References.

Verification of liability insurance, see § 39-16.1-20.1.

39-08-20.1.
Uninsured motorist — Insurance deductible.

If a person causes damage to another or another’s property with a motor vehicle while in violation of section 39-08-20, at minimum the court shall order that person to pay to the other person the amount of the deductible on that person’s insurance.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 347, § 1.

39-08-20.2.
Special mobile equipment and liability insurance — Report — Penalty.

Special mobile equipment is not subject to the requirement of a motor vehicle liability policy under section 39-08-20. However, special mobile equipment must be covered under a liability policy. Failure to provide satisfactory evidence of liability coverage required under this section within ten days after a police officer has requested evidence of liability coverage is an infraction punishable solely by a fine of one hundred fifty dollars for a first violation and is an infraction punishable solely by a fine of three hundred dollars for a second or subsequent violation in three years. A municipal court or district court shall make a report of a violation of this section to the secretary of state for any special mobile equipment owned or operated by a contractor licensed under chapter 43-07.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 270, § 1, effective April 16, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective April 16, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 3 of chapter 270, S.L. 2015.

39-08-21.
Medical qualifications exemption for intrastate drivers.

Notwithstanding the adoption by the superintendent of the state highway patrol of federal motor carrier safety regulations pursuant to subsection 3 of section 39-21-46, the provisions of 49 CFR 391.41(b)(1)-(11) do not apply to a person who is qualified through a state medical waiver program to operate a commercial motor vehicle within the boundaries of this state or a person who:

Is otherwise qualified to operate a commercial motor vehicle and who possesses, on March 26, 1991, a class 1 license issued pursuant to section 39-06-14, as that section existed on June 30, 1989, or a class A license issued pursuant to chapter 39-06.2;

Operates a commercial motor vehicle only within the boundaries of this state; and

Has a medical or physical condition that:

Would prevent such person from operating a commercial motor vehicle under federal motor carrier safety regulations contained in 49 CFR, chapter III, subchapter B;

Existed on March 26, 1991, or at the time of the first required physical examination after that date; and

An examining physician has determined has not substantially worsened since March 26, 1991, or the time of the first required physical examination after that date.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 423, § 1; 1999, ch. 340, § 6; 1999, ch. 348, § 1; 2003, ch. 317, § 5.

39-08-22.
Nonpayment for motor fuels — Penalty.

For a theft offense in violation of chapter 12.1-23 which involves a person who leaves the premises of an establishment at which motor fuel is offered for retail sale after motor fuel was dispensed into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle that that person drove away without having made due payment or authorized charge for the motor fuel dispensed, the court may:

Upon a person’s second conviction, order the suspension of the person’s driving privileges for up to three months; and

Upon a person’s third or subsequent conviction, order the suspension of the person’s driving privileges for up to six months.

As used in this section, “conviction” means a final conviction without regard to whether sentence was suspended or deferred or probation was granted after the conviction. Forfeiture of bail, bond, or collateral deposited to secure a defendant’s appearance in court, which forfeiture has not been vacated, is equivalent to conviction.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 349, § 1.

39-08-23.
Use of a wireless communications device prohibited.

The operator of a motor vehicle that is part of traffic may not use a wireless communications device to compose, read, or send an electronic message.

Under this section:

“Electronic message” means a self-contained piece of digital communication that is designed or intended to be transmitted between physical devices. The term includes electronic mail, a text message, an instant message, a command or request to access a worldwide web page, or other data that uses a commonly recognized electronic communications protocol. The term does not include:

Reading, selecting, or entering a telephone number, an extension number, or voice mail retrieval codes and commands into an electronic device for the purpose of initiating or receiving a telephone or cellular phone call or using voice commands to initiate or receive a telephone or cellular phone call;

Inputting, selecting, or reading information on a global positioning system device or other navigation system device;

Using a device capable of performing multiple functions, such as fleet management systems, dispatching devices, phones, citizen band radios, music players, or similar devices, for a purpose that is not otherwise prohibited;

Voice or other data transmitted as a result of making a telephone or cellular phone call;

Data transmitted automatically by a wireless communication device without direct initiation by an individual; or

A wireless communications device used in a voice-activated, voice-operated, or any other hands-free manner.

“Traffic” means operation of a motor vehicle while in motion or for the purposes of travel on any street or highway and includes a temporary stop or halt of motion, such as at an official traffic-control signal or sign. The term does not include a motor vehicle that is lawfully parked.

This section does not apply if a wireless communications device is used for obtaining emergency assistance to report a traffic accident, medical emergency, or serious traffic hazard or to prevent a crime about to be committed, in the reasonable belief that an individual’s life or safety is in immediate danger, or in an authorized emergency vehicle while in the performance of official duties.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 279, § 3; 2017, ch. 269, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

39-08-24.
Use of an electronic communication device by minor prohibited.

An individual at least sixteen and under eighteen years of age who has been issued a class D license may not operate an electronic communication device to talk, compose, read, or send an electronic message while operating a motor vehicle that is in motion unless the sole purpose of operating the device is to obtain emergency assistance, to prevent a crime about to be committed, or in the reasonable belief that an individual’s life or safety is in danger.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 272, § 7.

39-08-25.
Failure to maintain control.

An operator of a motor vehicle may not fail to maintain control of that motor vehicle. An individual is in violation of this section if that individual:

Commits an offense under this title and, at the time of the offense, the individual was engaged in the operation of a motor vehicle while distracted; or

Is determined to have been the operator of a motor vehicle that was involved in a reportable accident as defined in section 39-08-09 which resulted in property damage and, at the time the reportable accident occurred, the individual was engaged in the operation of a motor vehicle while distracted.

An individual may be issued a citation or summons for any other traffic offense that was committed by the individual in relation to the individual’s commission of the traffic offense of failure to maintain control of a motor vehicle.

As used in this section, “operation of a motor vehicle while distracted” means the operation of a motor vehicle by an individual who, while operating the vehicle, is engaged in an activity that:

Is not necessary to the operation of the vehicle; and

Actually impairs, or would reasonably be expected to impair, the ability of the individual to safely operate the vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 269, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.